Indiana, session 2026, HB1156.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-12-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 14. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c)
and except as provided in section 40.5 of this chapter, an individual
may have the sum of fourteen thousand dollars ($14,000) deducted
from the assessed value of the real property, mobile home not assessed
as real property, or manufactured home not assessed as real property
that the individual owns (or the real property, mobile home not
assessed as real property, or manufactured home not assessed as real
property that the individual is buying under a contract that provides
that the individual is to pay property taxes on the real property, mobile
home, or manufactured home if the contract or a memorandum of the
contract is recorded in the county recorder's office) if:
(1) the individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States for at least ninety (90) days;
(2) the individual received an honorable discharge;
(3) the individual either:
2026 IN 1156—LS 6768/DI 134


(A) has a total disability; or
(B) is at least sixty-two (62) years old and has a disability of at
least ten percent (10%);
(4) the individual's disability is evidenced by:
(A) a pension certificate or an award of compensation issued
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(B) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
deduction under this section; and
(5) the individual:
(A) owns the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home; or
(B) is buying the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home under contract;
on the date the statement required by section 15 of this chapter is
filed.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), The surviving
spouse of an individual may receive the deduction provided by this
section if:
(1) the individual satisfied the requirements of subsection (a)(1)
through (a)(4) at the time of death; or
(2) the individual:
(A) was killed in action;
(B) died while serving on active duty in the military or naval
forces of the United States; or
(C) died while performing inactive duty training in the military
or naval forces of the United States; and
the surviving spouse satisfies the requirement of subsection (a)(5) at
the time the deduction statement is filed. The surviving spouse is
entitled to the deduction regardless of whether the property for which
the deduction is claimed was owned by the deceased veteran or the
surviving spouse before the deceased veteran's death.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (f), no one is entitled to the
deduction provided by this section if the assessed value of the
individual's Indiana real property, Indiana mobile home not assessed as
real property, and Indiana manufactured home not assessed as real
property, as shown by the tax duplicate, exceeds the assessed value
limit specified in subsection (d).
(d) Except as provided in subsection (f), for the:
(1) January 1, 2017, January 1, 2018, and January 1, 2019,
2026 IN 1156—LS 6768/DI 134


assessment dates, the assessed value limit for purposes of
subsection (c) is one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000);
(2) January 1, 2020, January 1, 2021, January 1, 2022, and
January 1, 2023, assessment dates, the assessed value limit for
purposes of subsection (c) is two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000); and
(3) January 1, 2024, assessment date and for each assessment date
thereafter, the assessed value limit for purposes of subsection (c)
is two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000).
(e) (c) An individual who has sold real property, a mobile home not
assessed as real property, or a manufactured home not assessed as real
property to another person under a contract that provides that the
contract buyer is to pay the property taxes on the real property, mobile
home, or manufactured home may not claim the deduction provided
under this section against that real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home.
(f) For purposes of determining the assessed value of the real
property, mobile home, or manufactured home under subsection (d) for
an individual who has received a deduction under this section in a
previous year, increases in assessed value that occur after the later of:
(1) December 31, 2019; or
(2) the first year that the individual has received the deduction;
are not considered unless the increase in assessed value is attributable
to substantial renovation or new improvements. Where there is an
increase in assessed value for purposes of the deduction under this
section, the assessor shall provide a report to the county auditor
describing the substantial renovation or new improvements, if any, that
were made to the property prior to the increase in assessed value.
SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) IC 6-1.1-12-14, as
amended by this act, applies to assessment dates after December
31, 2026.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2029.
2026 IN 1156—LS 6768/DI 134